District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.08

Construction of unit.

Nothing in this unit shall be construed, or applied to necessarily require, or excuse noncompliance with any provision of any federal law. This unit and the penalties prescribed in § 7-2507.06, for violations of this unit, shall not supersede but shall supplement all statutes of the District and the United States in which similar conduct is prohibited or regulated.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 709, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2378.
1973 Ed., § 6-1878.